Connecticut, session 2026, SB00313.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) No person shall operate a
wake boat upon the waters of any lake in the state for the purpose of
conducting, or enabling any other person to conduct, wakeboarding or
wakesurfing unless such operation occurs not less than two hundred
feet from the shore of any such lake. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to: (1) Prohibit any municipality from requiring that any such
operation occur at a distance greater than two hundred feet from shore,
or (2) negate or preempt any prohibition on the use of wake boats on
any lake that borders the towns of Warren, Washington and Kent. For
the purposes of this section, "wake boat" means any vessel that uses
ballast tanks, wake shapers, hydrofoils or similar devices that are
designed to artificially increase or enhance the wake of such vessel.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
LCO No. 1414 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 313